Louisiana, session 2026, HB245.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 15:574.2(D)(8)(a) and (D)(9)(a)(i) and 574.22 are hereby amended
and reenacted to read as follows:
§574.2. Committee on parole, Board of Pardons; membership; qualifications;
vacancies; compensation; domicile; venue; meetings; quorum; panels;
powers and duties; transfer of property to committee; representation of
applicants before the committee; prohibitions
* * *
D. In accordance with the provisions of this Part, the committee on parole
shall have the following powers and duties:
* * *
(8)(a) To notify the district attorney of the parish where the conviction
occurred and the attorney general. The notification shall be in writing and shall be
issued at least ninety days prior to the parole hearing date and at least thirty days
prior to a medical parole or medical treatment furlough hearing date. The district
attorney of the parish where the conviction occurred and the attorney general shall
be allowed to may review the record of the offender since incarceration, including
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 245 ENROLLED
but not limited to any educational or vocational training, rehabilitative program
participation, disciplinary conduct, and risk assessment score. The district attorney
and the attorney general shall be allowed to may present testimony to the committee
on parole and submit information relevant to the proceedings.
* * *
(9)(a)(i) To notify the victim, or the spouse or next of kin of a deceased
victim, when the offender is scheduled for a parole hearing. The notification shall
be in writing and sent by mail or electronic communications no less than at least
ninety days prior to the parole hearing date and at least thirty days prior to a medical
parole or medical treatment furlough hearing date. The notice shall advise the
victim, or the spouse or next of kin of a deceased victim, of how to obtain
information about their rights with regard to the hearing. The notice is not required
when the victim, or the spouse or next of kin of a deceased victim, advises the
committee in writing that such notification is not desired.
* * *
§574.22. Parole ineligibility
No person committed to the Department of Public Safety and Corrections for
an offense committed on or after August 1, 2024, shall be is eligible for parole under
pursuant to this Part except a person who satisfies the provisions of R.S.
15:574.4(D), (E), (F), (G), (H), (J), or (K), or R.S. 15:574.20(B) or (C).
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.